Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,159
Amendment by board of directors
or shareholders.

(MBCA
10.20) (a) A corporation's shareholders may amend or repeal the corporation's
bylaws.

(b) A corporation's board
of directors may amend or repeal the corporation's bylaws, unless:

(1) The articles of incorporation
or section 21-2,160 reserves that power exclusively to the shareholders in
whole or part; or

(2) Except as provided in
subsection (d) of section 21-224, the shareholders in amending, repealing,
or adopting a bylaw expressly provide that the board of directors may not
amend, repeal, or reinstate that bylaw.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 159.
January 1, 2017